Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.530

Withdrawal of registration of registered foreign entity.

(1) A registered foreign entity may withdraw its registration by delivering a statement of withdrawal to the secretary of state for filing. The statement of withdrawal must be executed by the entity and state:

(a) The name of the entity and its jurisdiction of formation;

(b) That the entity is not doing business in this state and that it withdraws its registration to do business in this state;

(c) That the entity revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf in this state; and

(d) An address to which service of process may be made under subsection (3) of this section.

(2) For foreign corporations, the statement of withdrawal must be accompanied by a copy of a revenue clearance certificate issued pursuant to RCW 82.32.260.

(3) After the withdrawal of the registration of an entity, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the entity was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2017 c 31 s 3; 2015 c 176 s 1507.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.